Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-204
Jail record; required entries; open for inspection; period maintained.

The officer in charge of any municipal jail shall keep a written record which shall show the name of each person confined, the date of the commencement and termination of his or her confinement, the nature of the charge against him or her, and the medical service provided. Such officer shall keep such further records as may be prescribed by the rules of the Jail Standards Board. The records so kept shall be subject to the inspection of any person and to the public generally and shall be kept for such periods of time as may be prescribed by the rules of the State Records Administrator.

Laws 1915, c. 208, § 4, p. 463;

C.S.1922, § 3013;

C.S.1929, § 47-118;

R.S.1943, § 47-204;

Laws 1971, LB 271, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 37;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 15.